Maryland, session 2025, HB0671.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Environment
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0671*

HOUSE BILL 671
9–505.
(a) In addition to the other requirements of this subtitle, each county plan shall:
(18) For a county with a population greater than 150,000 according to the
latest Department of Planning projections, include a recycling plan by July 1, 2014 that:
(i) Provides for a reduction through recycling of at least 35% of the
county’s solid waste stream by weight or submits adequate justification, including economic
and other specific factors, as to why the 35% reduction cannot be met;
(ii) Provides for recycling of the solid waste stream to the extent
practical and economically feasible, but in no event may less than a 15% reduction be
submitted; and
(iii) Requires full implementation of the recycling plan by December
31, 2015; [and]
(19) For a county with a population less than 150,000 according to the latest
Department of Planning projections, include a recycling plan by July 1, 2014 that:
(i) Provides for a reduction through recycling of at least 20% of the
county’s solid waste stream or submits adequate justification, including economic and other
specific factors, as to why the 20% reduction cannot be met;
(ii) Provides for recycling of the solid waste stream to the extent
practical and economically feasible, but in no event may less than a 10% reduction be
submitted; and
(iii) Requires full implementation of the recycling plan by December
31, 2015; AND
(20) BY JANUARY 1, 2026, INCLUDE A PLAN TO:
(I) MINIMIZE THE INUNDATION OF EXISTING ON–SITE SEWAGE
DISPOSAL SYSTEMS FROM FLOODING AND SEA LEVEL RISE; AND
(II) LIMIT THE INSTALLATION OF NEW ON–SITE SEWAGE
DISPOSAL SYSTEMS IN AREAS OF THE COUNTY THAT ARE DELINEATED AS:
1. A COAST SMART CLIMATE READY ACTION
BOUNDARY; OR
2. A RIVERINE CLIMATE READY ACTION BOUNDARY.

HOUSE BILL 671 3
9–1108.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “CLIMATE VULNERABLE AREA” MEANS AN AREA OF THE STATE
THAT IS DELINEATED AS:
(I) A COAST SMART CLIMATE READY ACTION BOUNDARY; OR
(II) A RIVERINE CLIMATE READY ACTION BOUNDARY.
(3) “Nitrogen removal technology” means the best available technology for
the removal of nitrogen.
[(3)] (4) “On–site sewage disposal system” means a sewage treatment
unit, collection system, disposal area, and related appurtenances.
(b) (1) [A] SUBJECT TO SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS SECTION, A person may
not:
[(1)] (I) Install, or have installed, on property a person owns in the State
in the Chesapeake and Atlantic Coastal Bays Critical Area, an on–site sewage disposal
system to service a newly constructed building, unless the on–site sewage disposal system
utilizes nitrogen removal technology; or
[(2)] (II) Replace or have replaced, an existing on–site sewage disposal
system on property a person owns in the State in the Chesapeake and Atlantic Coastal
Bays Critical Area, unless the replacement on–site sewage disposal system utilizes
nitrogen removal technology.
[(c) (1)] (2) [Subject to paragraph (2) of this subsection and in] IN
accordance with § 9–1605.2(h) of this title, the Department shall assist homeowners in
paying the cost difference between a conventional on–site sewage disposal system and a
system that utilizes nitrogen removal technology with money from the Bay Restoration
Fund, if sufficient funds are available.
[(2) In calendar years 2010, 2011, and 2012, the Department shall assist
homeowners by paying 100% of the cost difference between a conventional on–site sewage
disposal system and a system that utilizes nitrogen removal technology with money from
the Bay Restoration Fund, if the homeowner:
(i) Is required under subsection (b)(2) of this section to replace an
existing on–site sewage disposal system with an on–site sewage disposal system that
utilizes nitrogen removal technology; and
(ii) Has a failing on–site sewage disposal system.]

HOUSE BILL 671
(C) (1) BEGINNING JULY 1, 2026, A PERSON MAY NOT:
(I) INSTALL, OR HAVE INSTALLED, ON PROPERTY A PERSON
OWNS IN THE STATE IN A CLIMATE VULNERABLE AREA, AN ON–SITE SEWAGE
DISPOSAL SYSTEM TO SERVICE A NEWLY CONSTRUCTED BUILDING, UNLESS:
1. THE ON–SITE SEWAGE DISPOSAL SYSTEM:
A. UTILIZES NITROGEN REMOVAL TECHNOLOGY; AND
B. WAS APPROVED BY THE DEPARTMENT WITH
CONSIDERATION GIVEN TO CLIMATE RESILIENCY, INCLUDING THE POTENTIAL FOR
FUTURE INUNDATION OF DRAIN FIELDS AND BACKUP DRAIN FIELDS ON THE
PROPERTY; AND
2. THE PERSON PAYS TO THE DEPARTMENT AN
ALTERNATIVE COMPLIANCE FEE IN AN AMOUNT EQUIVALENT TO THE COST OF
CONNECTING THE PROPERTY TO AN EXISTING MUNICIPAL WASTEWATER FACILITY;
OR
(II) REPLACE OR HAVE REPLACED, AN EXISTING ON–SITE
SEWAGE DISPOSAL SYSTEM ON PROPERTY A PERSON OWNS IN THE STATE IN A
CLIMATE VULNERABLE AREA, UNLESS THE REPLACEMENT ON–SITE SEWAGE
DISPOSAL SYSTEM:
1. UTILIZES NITROGEN REMOVAL TECHNOLOGY; AND
2. WAS APPROVED BY THE DEPARTMENT WITH
CONSIDERATION GIVEN TO CLIMATE RESILIENCY, INCLUDING THE POTENTIAL FOR
FUTURE INUNDATION OF DRAIN FIELDS AND BACKUP DRAIN FIELDS ON THE
PROPERTY.
(2) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL DEPOSIT ANY FEES COLLECTED UNDER
PARAGRAPH (1)(I)2 OF THIS SUBSECTION INTO THE BAY RESTORATION FUND
ESTABLISHED UNDER § 9–1605.2 OF THIS TITLE.
(d) (1) Subject to paragraph (2) of this subsection, a person who violates
subsection (b) OR (C) of this section is subject to the civil and administrative penalties and
the enforcement mechanisms provided in §§ 9–334 through 9–342 of this title.
(2) The penalties imposed under this section may not exceed $8,000.
(e) (1) The Department shall adopt regulations to implement this section.

HOUSE BILL 671 5
(2) The regulations adopted in accordance with paragraph (1) of this
subsection shall include [provisions]:
(I) PROVISIONS to ensure that appropriate management measures
are provided for the operation and maintenance of nitrogen removal technology; AND
(II) SITE EVALUATION CRITERIA AND DESIGN REQUIREMENTS
FOR ON–SITE SEWAGE DISPOSAL SYSTEMS INSTALLED IN CLIMATE VULNERABLE
AREAS THAT MINIMIZE THE IMPACT FROM CLIMATE EVENTS, INCLUDING
PROHIBITING THE USE OF DEEP TRENCH SYSTEMS.
9–1605.2.
(g) There shall be deposited in the Bay Restoration Fund:
(1) Funds received from the restoration fee;
(2) Net proceeds of bonds issued by the Administration;
(3) Interest or other income earned on the investment of money in the Bay
Restoration Fund; [and]
(4) FEE REVENUE COLLECTED BY THE DEPARTMENT UNDER §
9–1108(C)(1)(I)2 OF THIS TITLE; AND
(5) Any additional money made available from any sources, public or
private, for the purposes for which the Bay Restoration Fund has been established.
(h) (1) [With regard to the funds collected under subsection (b)(1)(i)1 of this
section from users of an on–site sewage disposal system or holding tank that receive a water
bill and subsection (b)(1)(i)2 and 3 of this section, beginning in fiscal year 2006, the] THE
Comptroller shall:
(i) Establish a separate account within the Bay Restoration Fund
THAT CONSISTS OF:
1. FUNDS COLLECTED UNDER SUBSECTION (B)(1)(I)1
OF THIS SECTION FROM USERS OF AN ON–SITE SEWAGE DISPOSAL SYSTEM OR
HOLDING TANK THAT RECEIVE A WATER BILL AND SUBSECTION (B)(1)(I)2 AND 3 OF
THIS SECTION; AND
2. FEE REVENUE COLLECTED BY THE DEPARTMENT
UNDER § 9–1108(C)(1)(I)2 OF THIS TITLE; and

HOUSE BILL 671
(ii) Disburse the funds as provided under paragraph (2) of this
subsection.
(2) The Comptroller shall:
(i) Deposit 60% of the funds UNDER PARAGRAPH (1)(I)1 OF THIS
SUBSECTION AND ALL OF THE FUNDS UNDER PARAGRAPH (1)(I)2 OF THIS
SUBSECTION in the separate account to be used for:
1. Subject to paragraphs (3), (4), (5), and (6) of this
subsection, with priority first given to failing systems and holding tanks located in the
Chesapeake and Atlantic Coastal Bays Critical Area and then to failing systems that the
Department determines are a threat to public health or water quality, grants or loans for
up to 100% of:
A. The costs attributable to upgrading an on–site sewage
disposal system to the best available technology for the removal of nitrogen;
B. The cost difference between a conventional on–site sewage
disposal system and a system that utilizes the best available technology for the removal of
nitrogen;
C. The cost of repairing or replacing a failing on–site sewage
disposal system with a system that uses the best available technology for nitrogen removal;
D. The cost, up to the sum of the costs authorized under item
B of this item for each individual system, of replacing multiple on–site sewage disposal
systems located in the same community with a new community sewerage system that is
owned by a local government and that meets enhanced nutrient removal standards; or
E. The cost, up to the sum of the costs authorized under item
C of this item for each individual system, of connecting a property using an on–site sewage
disposal system to an existing municipal wastewater facility that is achieving, or has signed
a funding agreement with the Department and is under construction to achieve, enhanced
nutrient removal or biological nutrient removal level treatment, including payment of the
principal, but not interest, of debt issued by a local government for such connection costs;
2. The reasonable costs of the Department, not to exceed 8%
of the funds deposited into the separate account, to:
A. Implement an education, outreach, and upgrade program
to advise owners of on–site sewage disposal systems and holding tanks on the proper
maintenance of the systems and tanks and the availability of grants and loans under item
1 of this item;
B. Review and approve the design and construction of on–site
sewage disposal system or holding tank upgrades;

HOUSE BILL 671 7
C. Issue grants or loans as provided under item 1 of this item;
and
D. Provide technical support for owners of upgraded on–site
sewage disposal systems or holding tanks to operate and maintain the upgraded systems;
3. A portion of the reasonable costs of a local public entity
that has been delegated by the Department under § 1–301(b) of this article to administer
and enforce environmental laws, not to exceed 10% of the funds deposited into the separate
account, to implement regulations adopted by the Department for on–site sewage disposal
systems that utilize the best available technology for the removal of nitrogen;
4. Subject to paragraph (7) of this subsection, financial
assistance to low–income homeowners, as defined by the Department, for up to 50% of the
cost of an operation and maintenance contract of up to 5 years for an on–site sewage
disposal system that utilizes nitrogen removal technology;
5. Subject to paragraph (8) of this subsection, a local
jurisdiction to provide financial assistance to eligible homeowners for the reasonable cost
of pumping out an on–site sewage disposal system, at least once every 5 years, unless a
more frequent pump out schedule is recommended during an inspection, not to exceed 10%
of the funds allocated to the local jurisdiction; [and]
6. In fiscal years 2020 and 2021, financial assistance to a
local jurisdiction for the development of a septic stewardship plan that meets the
requirements under paragraph (8)(iii)2 of this subsection; and
7. IF THE DEPARTMENT APPROVES THE INSTALLATION
OR REPLACEMENT OF AN ON–SITE SEWAGE DISPOSAL SYSTEM IN A CLIMATE
VULNERABLE AREA IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 9–1108(C) OF THIS TITLE, FINANCIAL
ASSISTANCE TO LOW–INCOME HOMEOWNERS, AS DEFINED BY THE DEPARTMENT,
FOR UP TO 100% OF THE COSTS ATTRIBUTABLE TO INSTALLING OR REPLACING THE
DRAIN FIELD OF THE ON–SITE SEWAGE DISPOSAL SYSTEM; AND
(ii) Transfer 40% of the funds UNDER PARAGRAPH (1)(I)1 OF THIS
SUBSECTION to the Maryland Agriculture Water Quality Cost Share Program in the
Department of Agriculture in order to fund cover crop activities.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.